New York, session 2025-2026, S3695.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 394-bb to read as follows: 3 § 394-bb. Confession of judgment requirement for certain contracts; 4 prohibition. 1. No person shall require a confession of judgment in any 5 contract or agreement for a financial product or service. 6 2. As used in this section the following terms shall have the follow- 7 ing meanings: 8 (a) "Financial product or service" shall mean any financial product or 9 financial service offered or provided by any person regulated or 10 required to be regulated by the superintendent of financial services 11 pursuant to the banking law or the insurance law or any financial prod- 12 uct or service offered or sold to consumers except financial products or 13 services: (i) regulated under the exclusive jurisdiction of a federal 14 agency or authority, (ii) regulated for the purpose of consumer or 15 investor protection by any other state agency, state department or state 16 public authority, or (iii) where rules or regulations promulgated by the 17 superintendent of financial services on such financial product or 18 service would be preempted by federal law. 19 (b) "Financial product or service regulated for the purpose of consum- 20 er or investor protection": (i) shall include (A) any product or service 21 for which registration or licensing is required or for which the offeror 22 or provider is required to be registered or licensed by state law, (B) 23 any product or service as to which provisions for consumer or investor 24 protection are specifically set forth for such product or service by EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07918-01-5 S. 3695 2 1 state statute or regulation and (C) securities, commodities and real 2 property subject to the provisions of article twenty-three-A of this 3 chapter, and (ii) shall not include products or services solely subject 4 to other general laws or regulations for the protection of consumers or 5 investors. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 7 have become a law.